Maine, session 132, LD1156.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §101, sub-§33-A is enacted to read:
33-A. Military surplus vehicle. "Military surplus vehicle" means a wheeled,
multipurpose or tactical vehicle, including a trailer, at least 25 years old, that was
manufactured for military use by or under the direction of the United States Armed Forces
or the armed forces of any other country and was subsequently authorized for sale to
civilians.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §458-C is enacted to read:
§458-C. Military surplus vehicles
A military surplus vehicle may be registered in accordance with the provisions of this
section.
1. Registration fee. The fee for the military surplus vehicle registration plate is the
motor vehicle registration fee required by section 501 and the excise tax required by Title
36, section 1482.
2. Registration plates. The Secretary of State shall issue a registration certificate and
a set of military surplus vehicle registration plates in a 3-number and 3-letter combination
sequence to be displayed on the military surplus vehicle in lieu of regular registration
plates.
3. Application. An application for registration of a military surplus vehicle under this
section must be accompanied by evidence of the transfer of title from the Federal
Government to the registrant and an affidavit that the military surplus vehicle is garaged or
maintained in the State.
4. Registration. The registration must indicate that the vehicle is a military surplus
vehicle.
5. Vanity plates. The Secretary of State may issue vanity plates for military surplus
vehicles in accordance with section 453 and may not duplicate vanity plates issued in
another class of plate.
6. Weight limit. A military surplus vehicle registration plate may be issued only for
a military surplus vehicle that does not exceed 10,000 pounds.
7. Inspection. A military surplus vehicle is subject to the inspection requirements of
section 1751, except that the Chief of the State Police may provide certain exemptions for
military surplus vehicles pursuant to section 1769.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §2094 is enacted to read:
§2094. Military surplus vehicles
A military surplus vehicle may not be used for general transportation purposes but may
be used for participation in parades, exhibitions, off-road events, on-road club activities,
tours, educational activities and similar uses; for transportation to and from these activities
and uses; and for maintenance, repair, sale and occasional pleasure driving.
Page 1 - 132LR1537(01)